New York, session 2025-2026, S566.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 108 of the executive law, 2 as separately amended by chapters 222 and 521 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 There is created in the office of the secretary of state a program to 5 be known as the "address confidentiality program" to protect victims of 6 domestic violence, victims of human trafficking, victims of kidnapping, 7 victims of a sexual offense, victims of stalking, [and] reproductive 8 health care services providers, employees, volunteers, patients, or 9 immediate family members of reproductive health care services providers, 10 and election officers by authorizing the use of designated addresses for 11 such [victims] individuals and their minor children. The program shall 12 be administered by the secretary of state. 13 § 2. Clause (A) of subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 14 and subdivision 3 of section 108 of the executive law, as separately 15 amended by chapters 222 and 521 of the laws of 2022, are amended to read 16 as follows: 17 (A) the applicant, or the minor or incapacitated person on whose 18 behalf the application is made, is a victim of domestic violence, victim 19 of human trafficking, victim of kidnapping, victim of a sexual offense, 20 victim of stalking, [or] a reproductive health care services provider, 21 employee, volunteer, patient, or an immediate family member of a repro- 22 ductive health care services provider, or an election officer; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02022-01-5 S. 566 2 1 3. Designation of agencies to assist applicants. The secretary shall 2 designate state, local or nonprofit agencies that provide counseling, 3 referral, shelter or other specialized services to victims of domestic 4 violence, victims of human trafficking, victims of kidnapping, victims 5 of a sexual offense, victims of stalking, and reproductive health care 6 services providers, employees, volunteers, patients, or immediate family 7 members of reproductive health care services providers to assist persons 8 applying to be program participants. The secretary shall designate coun- 9 ty boards of elections to assist election officers in applying to be 10 program participants. Such persons providing assistance shall be trained 11 by the secretary. Any assistance and counseling rendered by an officer 12 of the secretary or [his or her] their designees to applicants shall in 13 no way be construed as legal advice. 14 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 108 of the executive law is amended by 15 adding a new paragraph (o) to read as follows: 16 (o) "Election officer" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 17 section 1-104 of the election law. 18 § 4. Clause (B) of subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 19 of section 108 of the executive law, as amended by chapter 222 of the 20 laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 21 (B) the applicant, or the minor or incapacitated person on whose 22 behalf the application is made, has left [his or her] their residence 23 because of such violence or acts, provided, however, this clause shall 24 not apply if the applicant is a reproductive health care services 25 provider, employee, volunteer, patient, or an immediate family member of 26 a reproductive health care services provider, or an election officer; 27 § 5. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 28 108 of the executive law, as amended by chapter 222 of the laws of 2022, 29 is amended to read as follows: 30 (iv) the actual address or addresses that the applicant requests not 31 be disclosed because of the increased risk of domestic violence, a sexu- 32 al offense, stalking, physical injury or in the case of reproductive 33 health care services provider, employee, volunteer, patient, or an imme- 34 diate family member of a reproductive health care services provider, or 35 an election officer, other threats of violence; and 36 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.